Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General

§ 33-1-101.
Sheriff to furnish licenses and collect fees.

It shall be the duty of the sheriff of each county to furnish all licenses and collect all moneys for the same as hereinafter provided, and if the sheriff of any county shall knowingly permit any person subject to such license to conduct or carry on any branch of business, occupation or pursuit without first obtaining such license, such sheriff shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished as provided by law in case of similar offenses.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1433; R.S. 1899, § 2151; C.S. 1910, § 2821; C.S. 1920, § 3368; R.S. 1931, § 65-101; C.S. 1945, § 37-101; W.S. 1957, § 33-1.

County commissioner's discretion. —

County commissioners were not justified in refusing a license solely because of opposition to operation of saloons. State ex rel. Rehder v. Board of Comm'rs, 26 Wyo. 75, 177 P. 130,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1919).

Cited

in

Sprekelsen v. State, 23 Wyo. 420, 152 P. 791,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(1915).

§ 33-1-102.
Licenses to be prepared by county clerk; contents of licenses; disposition of moneys.

Licenses shall be prepared by the county clerk and shall be delivered to the sheriff of the county wherein they shall be issued, and each license shall contain the name of the person and the character and place of business to be conducted under such license; and it shall be the duty of the county clerk to affix his official signature and the seal of the county to such license, which license shall be countersigned by the county treasurer or his deputy, before being issued by the sheriff, and all moneys collected under and for such license shall be paid by the sheriff into the county treasury within fifteen (15) days from the date of said license.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1434; R.S. 1899, § 2152; C.S. 1910, § 2822; C.S. 1920, § 3369; R.S. 1931, § 65-102; C.S. 1945, § 37-102; W.S. 1957, § 33-2.

Cited

in

Sprekelsen v. State, 23 Wyo. 420, 152 P. 791,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(1915); State v. Board of Comm'rs, 26 Wyo. 75, 177 P. 130,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1919).

§ 33-1-103.
Clerk to keep abstract of licenses; inspection by commissioners.

It shall be the duty of the county clerk to keep on file in his office, and submit for the inspection of the county commissioners at each of their regular sessions, a faithful and correct abstract containing full information of all licenses so issued to the sheriff, and neglect to comply with the provisions of this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided by law.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1435; R.S. 1899, § 2153; C.S. 1910, § 2823; C.S. 1920, § 3370; R.S. 1931, § 65-103; C.S. 1945, § 37-103; W.S. 1957, § 33-3.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for misdemeanor generally, see §

6-10-103

.

Cited

in

Sprekelsen v. State, 23 Wyo. 420, 152 P. 791,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(1915).

§ 33-1-104.
County treasurer to make report of license receipts.

It shall be the duty of the county treasurer of each county to furnish to the county commissioners at each of their regular sessions a full and complete statement of all moneys received for licenses issued, as provided in W.S.

33-1-103

, failure or neglect on the part of the treasurer to comply with the provisions of this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor, and shall be punished as provided by law.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 1436; R.S. 1899, § 2154; C.S. 1910, § 2824; C.S. 1920, § 3371; R.S. 1931, § 65-104; C.S. 1945, § 37-104; W.S. 1957, § 33-4.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for misdemeanor generally, see §

6-10-103

.

§ 33-1-105.
License money to be credited to general fund.

All money collected for licenses, as provided for by this act [§§

33-1-102

through

33-1-105

,

33-1-109

through

33-1-113

], shall constitute a portion of, and be credited to, the general county fund.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1437; R.S. 1899, § 2155; C.S. 1910, § 2825; C.S. 1920, § 3372; R.S. 1931, § 65-105; C.S. 1945, § 37-105; W.S. 1957, § 33-5.

Meaning of “this act.” —

“The meaning of this act” apparently refers to C.L. 1876, ch. 76.

Cited

in

State v. Board of Comm'rs, 26 Wyo. 75, 177 P. 130,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1919).

§ 33-1-106.
Certain licenses payable to incorporated towns.

All licenses issued by any county in this state for the sale of liquors, or for owning or keeping a billiard table, or any table used for pool or bagatelle, and all licenses issued by the counties for any other game or games, not prohibited by the laws of this state, when the licensee shall be a resident of and carrying on the business for which he is licensed within the corporate limits of any incorporated town, city or village, the license shall be collected by the city marshal or collecting officer of the incorporated town, city or village, for the purposes mentioned in this section. It shall be the duty of the collecting officer, between the first and fifteenth days of each month, to pay into the treasury of such incorporated town, city or village, all monies collected for the licenses, which monies shall be applied to the general revenue purposes of the incorporated town, city or village.

History.

Laws 1884, ch. 55, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1438; Laws 1888, ch. 44, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2156; C.S. 1910, § 2826; C.S. 1920, § 3373; R.S. 1931, § 65-106; C.S. 1945, § 37-106; W.S. 1957, § 33-6; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to imposition of license tax on businesses by cities and towns generally, see § 15-1-103(a)(xiii).

The 2004 amendment

substituted “section” for “act,” and “monies” for “moneys” throughout and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Municipal license in addition to county license. —

If municipal license is provided for by any municipality in lawful pursuance of its charter powers, it is in addition to county license, which may also be required. State ex rel. Noble v. Cheyenne, 7 Wyo. 417, 52 P. 975,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1898).

Revocation by county. —

City is not liable for unearned part of liquor license fee, where license was revoked by the county commissioners. Peterson v. Guernsey, 26 Wyo. 272, 183 P. 645,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1919).

Cited

in

Sprekelsen v. State, 23 Wyo. 420, 152 P. 791,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(1915); State v. Board of Comm'rs, 26 Wyo. 75, 177 P. 130,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1919).

§ 33-1-107.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 114, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-6.1; repealed by 2014 ch. 110, § 101, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-1-108.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 114, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-6.2; repealed by 2014 ch. 110, § 101, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1959, ch. 114, § 2, related to authority of county to levy and collect license tax.

§ 33-1-109.
Disposition of fines.

Every magistrate or other officer to whom any fines imposed under general laws of the state shall be paid for the use of the county, shall, at each regular meeting of the board of county commissioners, make a report of the total amount so collected, and all fines so collected shall be paid into the county treasury for the credit of the public school fund of the county, within thirty (30) days after collection thereof.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 15; R.S. 1887, § 1447; R.S. 1899, § 2157; C.S. 1910, § 2827; C.S. 1920, § 3374; R.S. 1931, § 65-107; C.S. 1945, § 37-107; W.S. 1957, § 33-7.

Editor's notes. —

As enacted, the words “under general laws of the state” read “by this act” and the words “public school fund of the county” read “general county fund.” Previous compilers made the changes indicated. For constitutional provision that all fines and penalties under the general laws of the state belong to the public school fund of the respective counties, see art. 7, § 5, Wyo. Const.

Demands for money collected treated as continuous transaction. —

Demands on clerk of district court, last of which was demand for all money due, could be treated as continuous transaction; hence noncompliance with each demand was not separate crime under embezzlement statute. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Demand may be made by either county commissioners or treasurer.

State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Or by county clerk for commissioners. —

Demands by county clerk pursuant to county commissioners' request was sufficient. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Admissibility of reports of clerk of court. —

Reports of clerk of the district court, certifying earnings of his office, were competent in embezzlement prosecution. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Prima facie case. —

Evidence made at least prima facie case that clerk of the district court, charged with embezzlement, actually collected amounts certified by him, for which he gave checks to treasurer. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 33-1-110.
Failure of officer to report fines.

Any magistrate or other officer neglecting, omitting or refusing to comply with the provisions of W.S.

33-1-109

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished as provided by law.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 16; R.S. 1887, § 1448; R.S. 1899, § 2158; C.S. 1910, § 2828; C.S. 1920, § 3375; R.S. 1931, § 65-108; C.S. 1945, § 37-108; W.S. 1957, § 33-8.

§ 33-1-111.
Informers may testify.

Persons prosecuting or giving information under the provisions of this act [§§

33-1-102

through

33-1-105

,

33-1-109

through

33-1-113

] may be competent witnesses on the trial thereof, notwithstanding their interest in the penalty to be recovered.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 17; R.S. 1887, § 1449; R.S. 1899, § 2159; C.S. 1910, § 2829; C.S. 1920, § 3376; R.S. 1931, § 65-109; C.S. 1945, § 37-109; W.S. 1957, § 33-9.

§ 33-1-112.
Penalties may be recovered by action.

Penalties incurred by a violation of the provisions of this act [§§

33-1-102

through

33-1-105

,

33-1-109

through

33-1-113

] may be recovered by action of debt in the name of the county prosecuting the same, or by indictment or complaint in the name of the people of the state of Wyoming.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 18; R.S. 1887, § 1450; R.S. 1899, § 2160; C.S. 1910, § 2830; C.S. 1920, § 3377; R.S. 1931, § 65-110; C.S. 1945, § 37-110; W.S. 1957, § 33-10.

§ 33-1-113.
Unpaid licenses.

If any sheriff fail, from causes not within his control to collect the amount payable on any license issued as provided in W.S.

33-1-101

, after such license has been issued, such license shall be returned to the county treasurer within twenty (20) days after the issuance thereof, and it shall be the duty of said county treasurer to note the fact of such failure to collect, and to return the license to the office of the county clerk at the next regular session of the board of county commissioners; said license shall be cancelled or destroyed by said board of county commissioners.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 19; R.S. 1887, § 1451; R.S. 1899, § 2161; C.S. 1910, § 2831; C.S. 1920, § 3378; R.S. 1931, § 65-111; C.S. 1945, § 37-111; W.S. 1957, § 33-11.

§ 33-1-114.
License applications; social security numbers required; exception.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute, a board or commission authorized to establish examination, permit or license application requirements for any profession or occupation regulated under this title shall require applicants for new licenses, certificates of registration or renewals of licenses or certificates to include the applicant’s social security number on the application form.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 193, § 1.

§ 33-1-115.
Professional assistance programs for health care providers and others as specified; confidentiality of records.

As used in this section:

“Health care provider” means a person who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession, and for purposes of this section also includes a pharmacist, pharmacy technician or veterinarian;

“Licensee” means:

Any individual holding a permit or license as a health care provider as a profession or occupation regulated under this title;

Any individual admitted to the Wyoming state bar; or

Any individual teaching in a public school pursuant to a certificate or permit issued under the laws of this state by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board.

“Professional assistance program” or “program” means a program or activity relating to mental or behavioral health referral or treatment and to drug or alcohol abuse prevention, referral, treatment or rehabilitation, which is directly or indirectly assisted by a board or commission or other organization established under this title for the regulation of licensees or the Wyoming state bar or the Wyoming professional teaching standards board established under W.S.

21-2-801

.

Any information pertaining to the identity, diagnosis, prognosis, referral or treatment of any licensee possessed in connection with the performance of any professional assistance program shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except under the circumstances expressly authorized by subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

The content of any record referred to in subsection (b) of this section may be disclosed in accordance with the prior written consent of the licensee with respect to whom the record is maintained.

Whether or not the licensee gives his written consent, the content of the record may be disclosed as follows:

To medical personnel to the extent necessary to meet a bona fide medical emergency;

For the purpose of conducting research or program evaluations, provided that the record may not identify any individual in the program;

As required to report under state law incidents of suspected child abuse or neglect to the appropriate authorities;

If authorized by an appropriate order of a court of competent jurisdiction granted after application showing good cause therefore;

If compelled in an administrative action before a board or commission to enforce its laws, rules, regulations or permit or license requirements, unless the disclosure would violate federal law; or

To the state board or commission regulating the licensee, if the diagnosis or prognosis determines a clearly definable mental or behavioral health problem or drug or alcohol abuse problem and the licensee refuses to seek treatment.

A court order under this section may authorize disclosure of confidential information only with notice to the professional assistance program and, after an opportunity for response and an in camera review if necessary, the court finds:

The disclosure is necessary to protect against an existing threat to life or of serious bodily injury;

The disclosure is necessary in connection with investigation or prosecution of an extremely serious crime such as one which directly threatens loss of life or serious bodily injury; or

The disclosure is in connection with litigation or an administrative proceeding in which the patient offers testimony or other evidence pertaining to the content of the confidential communications.

Except as provided in this section, referrals to a professional assistance program shall be absolutely privileged and no lawsuit predicated thereon may be instituted. The program, its board members, employees and agents shall be immune from suit for conduct within the scope of their functions without malice and in the reasonable belief that their actions were warranted, including conduct and actions performed by the terms of a contract with a state board or commission.

The department of health shall provide assistance to any certifying, permitting or licensure board that desires to establish professional assistance programs as defined under this section.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 83, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 2; 2005, ch. 179, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 132, § 1; 2014 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), added “or any individual admitted to the Wyoming state bar” in (ii), added “or the Wyoming state bar” in (iii); and inserted (d)(vi).

The 2006 amendment,

added “or” at the end of (d)(v); and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(ii) added (A) and redesignated the existing paragraphs accordingly; in (a)(iii) inserted “or the Wyoming professional teaching standards board established under W.S.

21-2-801

” at the end of the sentence; and in (g) inserted “certifying, permitting or” preceding “licensure board that.”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(iii), inserted “to mental or behavioral health referral or treatment and”; and in (d)(vi), inserted “mental or behavioral health problem or.”

Conflicting Legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 20, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 33-1-116.
Professional and occupational licensure of military service members.

As used in this section:

“Applicant” means a person seeking licensure, certification or registration from a professional or occupational licensing board under W.S.

21-2-802

or under this title of the Wyoming statutes;

“Military service” means service in the United States army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, United States public health service commissioned corps, national oceanic and atmospheric administration commissioned corps, national guard or any reserve or auxiliary component of any of these services;

“Military service member” means a person on active status in the military service, or a person released from military service within two (2) years of applying for licensure, certification or registration pursuant to this section and whose service was characterized upon release as honorable.

In determining whether a military service member applicant’s education and training meet a professional or occupational licensing board’s respective educational and training requirements, the board shall consider any relevant education, training and experience received by the applicant as a member of the armed forces or reserves of the United States, the national guard of any state, the military reserves of any state or the naval militia of any state.

Unless otherwise provided in this section, military service member applicants shall be subject to the other provisions of this title and to any requirements properly adopted by the professional or occupational licensing board to which the applicant has applied.

This section shall not apply to title 33, chapter 5 regarding attorneys-at-law or to any profession having authority to prescribe drugs that can only be obtained legally by prescription.

Professional and occupational licensing boards shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Any emergency medical service license sought under W.S.

33-26-101

through 33-26-113 by a veteran of military service, by a military service member except a member of the national guard, by a national guard member separating from an active duty tour or by the spouse of any of these persons shall be processed and considered pursuant to the requirements of the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

.

History.

2013 ch. 198, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2017 ch. 38, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (f).

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 198, § 2,
directs: “This act shall apply to applications for professional licensing which are filed on or after July 1, 2013.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 198, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

§ 33-1-117.
Temporary permits for military spouses.

As used in this section:

“Active” means a status of occupational or professional licensure which has not been suspended, revoked or terminated and which is not otherwise inactive;

“Applicant” means a military spouse seeking licensure from a professional or occupational licensing board of this state;

“Good standing” means a status of occupational or professional licensure which is in compliance with all requirements imposed by the issuing licensing, certification or registration authority;

“License” means any license, certificate or registration required to practice an occupation or profession;

“Military service member” means an active uniformed member of the United States army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, United States public health service commissioned corps, national oceanic and atmospheric administration commissioned corps, national guard or any reserve or auxiliary component thereof;

“Military spouse” means the spouse of a military service member as defined in paragraph (v) of this subsection who has been transferred or is scheduled to be transferred to Wyoming, is domiciled in Wyoming or has moved to Wyoming on a permanent change-of-station basis.

A professional or occupational licensing board shall issue an expedited license to a military spouse to allow the military spouse to lawfully practice a profession or occupation requiring licensure in this state if the military spouse:

Holds a relevant, active occupational or professional license in good standing from another state;

Demonstrates competency in the occupation or profession for which the military spouse applicant seeks licensure. Competency shall be determined pursuant to rules which shall be adopted for that purpose and may include consideration of continuing education credits, recent work experience, disciplinary actions taken against the applicant in other states and other factors used to determine the competency of nonmilitary spouse license applicants;

Has not engaged in any act that would constitute grounds for refusal, suspension or revocation of the occupational or professional license sought in this state; and

Completes all required application procedures and pays any required fee.

All relevant work experience of a military spouse applicant, including full-time or part-time experience, regardless of whether in a paid or volunteer capacity, may be credited in any work experience requirement adopted by an occupational or professional licensing board.

This section shall apply to all applications for licensure under W.S.

21-2-802

or under title 33 of the Wyoming statutes except title 33, chapter 5, attorneys at law and applications to any board which represents a profession with prescriptive drug authority.

Pursuant to rules which may be adopted for this purpose, a professional or occupational licensing board may issue a temporary practice permit to a military spouse applicant who meets the requirements of paragraph (b)(i) of this section and who has applied for a professional or occupational license under this section. The military spouse applicant may practice under the temporary permit for a period not to exceed three (3) years provided the military spouse is making progress toward satisfying the unmet licensure requirements, or until the professional or occupational license for which they have applied has been either granted or denied, whichever first occurs. A board shall not charge a military spouse any fees for a temporary permit under this subsection.

Professional or occupational licensing boards shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

On each licensure application or renewal form, a professional or occupational licensing board shall inquire and maintain a record of whether an applicant is a member of the military or military spouse. If an applicant self-identifies as and provides the board with satisfactory proof that the applicant is a military spouse, the board shall immediately commence the process of issuing a license or temporary permit.

History.

2013 ch. 197, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2021 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section heading, which read, "Professional and occupational licensure of military spouses; temporary permits"; in (b), added "expedited" and made a related change; deleted "which state mandates substantially equivalent or more stringent educational, training, examination and experience requirements for licensure.
Substantial equivalency shall be determined pursuant to rules which shall be adopted by the licensing board from which the military spouse applicant seeks licensure" at the end of (b)(i); in (e), substituted "three (3) years provided the military spouse is making progress toward satisfying the unmet licensure requirements" for "one hundred twenty (120) days" in the second sentence and added the third sentence; and added (g).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 197, § 1,
enacted this section as §

33-1-116

. It has been redesignated as §

33-1-117

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 197, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 197, § 2,
directs: “This act shall apply to applications for professional licensing
which are filed on or after July 1, 2013.”

§ 33-1-118.
Health care licensing boards; authority to discipline licensees for sexual misconduct.

A board which licenses health care providers may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or revoke the license, certificate or temporary permit of any licensee or certificate holder, or otherwise discipline a licensee or certificate holder, upon clear and convincing evidence that the licensee or certificate holder has committed sexual misconduct.

As used in this section:

“Health care provider” means an individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by the laws of this state to provide care, treatment, services or procedures to maintain, diagnose or otherwise treat a patient’s physical or mental condition;

“Sexual misconduct” means:

Any behavior by a licensee that involves offers of exchange of medical services for some form of sexual gratification; or

Sexual contact or sexual intrusion, as defined in W.S. 6-2-301(a), that occurs while the patient is under the care of the licensee.

History.

2018 ch. 80, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 80, § 5(b), makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

§ 33-1-119.
Applicability of Medical Digital Innovation Sandbox Act.

The Medical Digital Innovation Sandbox Act shall apply to the chapters within this title listed in W.S. 40-28-102(a).

History.

2019 ch. 198, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 198, § 5, makes the act effective January 1, 2020.

§ 33-1-120.
Professional and occupational licensure for qualified individuals licensed in other jurisdictions.

As used in this section:

“Active” means a status of occupational or professional licensure which has not been suspended, revoked or terminated and which is not otherwise inactive;

“Applicant” means a natural person seeking licensure from a professional or occupational licensing board of this state;

“Good standing” means a status of occupational or professional licensure which is in compliance with all requirements imposed by the issuing licensing, certification or registration authority;

“License” means any license, certificate or registration required to practice an occupation or profession.

A professional or occupational licensing board shall issue a license to an applicant to allow the applicant to lawfully practice a profession or occupation requiring licensure in this state if the Wyoming licensing board determines that the applicant:

Holds a relevant, active occupational or professional license in good standing from another state that mandates substantially equivalent or more stringent educational, training, examination and experience requirements for licensure than the licensing entity in this state. Substantial equivalency shall be determined pursuant to rules adopted by the licensing board in Wyoming provided that:

The educational equivalency shall be determined by whether the degree required is a doctorate, master, bachelor, associate or other degree with curriculum deemed substantially equivalent by the licensing board;

If the Wyoming licensing board requires an examination for licensure, the substantially equivalent examination requirement may be met by passing the same or an earlier version of the exam. The Wyoming licensing board shall waive this requirement if the individual has been licensed for more than ten (10) years;

In evaluating any work experience requirements the provisions of subsection (c) of this section shall apply;

In addition to any exam required under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph the Wyoming licensing board may require an examination relating to the specifics of Wyoming law and regulations regardless of the length of time the individual has been licensed.

Demonstrates competency in the occupation or profession for which the applicant seeks licensure. Competency shall be determined pursuant to rules that shall be adopted for that purpose and may include consideration of continuing education credits, recent work experience, prior licensing examinations, disciplinary actions taken against the applicant in other states and other appropriate factors;

Has not engaged in any act that would constitute grounds for refusal, suspension or revocation of the occupational or professional license sought in this state; and

Has completed all required application procedures and paid any required fee.

All relevant work experience of an applicant, including full-time or part-time experience, regardless of whether in a paid or volunteer capacity, may be credited in any work experience requirement adopted by an occupational or professional licensing board.

This section shall apply to all applications for licensure under W.S.

21-2-802

or under title 33 of the Wyoming statutes except for the following:

An application to be an attorney at law under chapter 5 of title 33;

An application to any board which represents a profession with prescriptive drug authority, but only with respect to the profession with the prescriptive drug authority.

Nothing in this section shall be held to limit the rights or privileges of a military service member under W.S.

33-1-116

.

History.

2021 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 31, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.